Washington statutes.
RCW 36.18.030

Coroner's fees.

Coroners shall collect for their official services, the following fees:

For each inquest held, besides mileage, twenty dollars.

For issuing a venire, two dollars.

For drawing all necessary writings, two dollars for first page and one dollar for each page thereafter.

For mileage each way, per mile, ten cents.

For performing the duties of a sheriff, he or she shall receive the same fees as a sheriff would receive for the same service.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4014; 1963 c 4 s 36.18.030. Prior: 1959 c 263 s 7; 1907 c 56 s 1, part, p 93; 1903 c 151 s 1, part, p 296; 1893 c 130 s 1, part, p 424; Code 1881 s 2086, part, p 360; 1869 p 372 s 7, part; 1863 p 391 s 1, part, p 396; 1861 p 34 s 1, part, p 39; 1854 p 368 s 1, part, p 373; RRS ss 497, part, 4185.]